en: Broccoli cut: Florets; Mixed cuts; Powder; Puree; Riced; Seeds; Spears; Sprouts/microgreens; Stems; Whole head; Other
nl: Broccoli snijwijze: Roosjes; Gemengde stukken; Poeder; Puree; Rijstvormig; Zaden; Stengels; Kiemen/microgroenten; Stelen; Hele stronk; Overig
cs: Způsob porcování brokolice: Růžičky; Míchané kousky; Prášek; Pyré; Drobně sekaná; Semínka; Růžičky s košťálem; Klíčky/mikrobylinky; Košťály; Celá hlávka; Jiné
fi: Parsakaalin leikkuutapa: Kukinnot; Erilaisia paloja; Jauhe; Sose; Muru; Siemenet; Varret; Idut/versot; Varret; Kokonainen; Muu
vi: Cách cắt bông cải xanh: Bông cải; Cắt hỗn hợp; Bột; Xay nhuyễn; Thái nhỏ như gạo; Hạt; Khúc dài; Mầm/rau mầm; Cuống; Nguyên cây; Khác
el: Κοπή μπρόκολου: Μπουκετάκια; Ανάμεικτες κοπές; Σκόνη; Πουρές; Τριμμένο (όπως το ρύζι); Σπόροι; Κλωνάρια; Φύτρες/μικρολαχανικά; Κοτσάνια; Ολόκληρο (κεφάλι); Άλλο
zh-TW: 綠花椰切塊: 小花; 混合切塊; 粉末; 泥; 米粒狀; 種子; 花莖; 芽菜/微型蔬菜; 莖; 整顆; 其他
th: รูปแบบการหั่นบรอกโคลี: ส่วนดอก; ชิ้นผสม; ชนิดผง; เพียวเร่; สับละเอียด; เมล็ด; หั่นก้านยาว; ต้นอ่อน/ไมโครกรีน; ก้าน; ทั้งหัว; อื่นๆ
nb: Brokkoli kuttet: Buketter; Blandede biter; Pulver; Puré; Riset; Frø; Lange buketter; Spirer/mikrogrønt; Stilker; Helt hode; Annet
sl-SI: Del brokolija: Cvetki; Mešani kosi; V prahu; Pire; Nastrgano; Semena; Vršički; Kalčki/mikrozelenje; Stebla; Cela glava; Drugo
sv: Broccoliskuren: Buketter; Blandade bitar; Pulver; Puré; Riven; Frön; Skott; Groddar/mikroblad; Stjälkar; Helt huvud; Övrigt
hr-HR: Brokula narezana: Cvatovi; Miješani komadi; Prah; Pire; Usitnjeno kao riža; Sjemenke; Izdanci; Klice/mikrozelenje; Stabljike; Cijela glavica; Ostalo
da: Broccoliudskæring: Buketter; Blandede udskæringer; Pulver; Puré; Revet; Frø; Stilke; Spirer/mikrogrønt; Stængler; Hele hoveder; Andet
zh-CN: 西兰花切法: 菜花块; 混合切块; 粉末; 菜泥; 米粒状; 种子; 菜茎; 菜芽/微型蔬菜; 菜梗; 整棵; 其他
ro-RO: Tăietură broccoli: Buchețele; Bucăți mixte; Pudră; Piure; Sub formă de orez; Semințe; Tije; Vlăstari/microplante; Tulpini; Căpățână întreagă; Altele
ko: 브로콜리 컷: 작은 송이; 혼합 컷; 분말; 퓨레; 라이스드; 씨앗; 스피어; 새싹/마이크로그린; 줄기; 통째; 기타
es: Corte de brócoli: Floretes; Cortes mixtos; Polvo; Puré; En forma de arroz; Semillas; Tallos con floretes; Brotes/microvegetales; Tallos; Cabeza entera; Otro
lt-LT: Brokolių pjaustymo tipas: Žiedynai; Mišraus pjaustymo; Milteliai; Piurė; Smulkinti (kaip ryžiai); Sėklos; Ūgliai / stiebai; Daigai / mikrožalumynai; Stiebai; Visa gūžė; Kita
bg-BG: Разрез на броколите: Розички; Смесени парчета; Прах; Пюре; На ориз; Семена; Стръкове; Кълнове/микрорастения; Стъбла; Цяла глава; Друго
pl: Sposób krojenia brokułów: Różyczki; Cięcie mieszane; Proszek; Purée; Rozdrobnione (ryż z brokułów); Nasiona; Pędy / Gałązki; Kiełki / mikroliście; Łodygi; Cała główka; Inny
ru: Способ нарезки брокколи: Соцветия; Разная нарезка; Порошок; Пюре; В виде риса; Семена; Стебли; Ростки/микрозелень; Ножки; Целый кочан; Другое
hu: Brokkoli darabolása: Rózsák; Vegyes; Por; Püré; Morzsolt; Magok; Hajtások; Csírák/mikrozöldségek; Szárak; Egész fej; Egyéb
pt-BR: Corte de brócolis: Floretes; Cortes mistos; Pó; Purê; Triturado (arroz); Sementes; Hastes; Brotos/microverdes; Talos; Cabeça inteira; Outros
it: Broccoli tagliati: Cimette; Tagli misti; Polvere; Purea; Tritato (riced); Semi; Gambi; Germogli/micro-ortaggi; Gambi; Testa intera; Altro
fr: Coupe du brocoli: Fleurettes; Coupes mixtes; Poudre; Purée; En grains; Graines; Tiges; Pousses/micro-pousses; Tiges; Tête entière; Autre
sk-SK: Odroda brokolice: Ružičky; Rôzne rezy; Prášok; Pyré; Nasekaná nadrobno; Semienka; Výhonky; Klíčky/mikrobylinky; Stonky; Celá hlava; Iné
pt-PT: Corte dos brócolos: Raminhos; Cortes mistos; Pó; Puré; Granulado; Sementes; Hastes; Rebentos/microvegetais; Talos; Cabeça inteira; Outro
tr: Brokoli kesimi: Çiçek; Karışık kesim; Toz; Püre; Pirinç boyutunda kesilmiş; Tohum; Uzun parça; Filiz/mikro yeşillik; Sap; Bütün baş; Diğer
ja: ブロッコリーカット: フローレット (小房); ミックスカット; パウダー; ピューレ; ライス状; 種子; スピア; スプラウト/マイクログリーン; 茎; 丸ごと (1株); その他
de: Form des Brokkolis: Röschen; Gemischte Schnitte; Pulver; Püree; Reisform; Samen; Stangen; Sprossen/Microgreens; Stiele; Ganzer Kopf; Sonstiges